Washington statutes.
RCW 12.12.070

Oath administered.

When the jury is selected, the justice shall administer to them an oath or affirmation, well and truly to try the cause.

[Code 1881 s 1776; 1873 p 348 s 75; 1854 p 236 s 76; RRS s 1853.]